Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 65 CARE AND TREATMENT OF PERSONS WITH MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS
27-65-109. Certification for short-term treatment - procedure.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2024.] If a person detained pursuant to section 27-65-106 has received an evaluation, the person may be certified for not more than three months for short-term treatment under the following conditions:

The professional staff of the agency or facility providing seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation has analyzed the person's condition and has found the person has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to others or to the person's self or is gravely disabled;

The person has been advised of the availability of, but has not accepted, voluntary treatment; but, if reasonable grounds exist to believe that the person will not remain in a voluntary treatment program, the person's acceptance of voluntary treatment does not preclude certification; and

The facility that will provide short-term treatment has been designated or approved by the commissioner to provide such treatment.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

A person may be certified for not more than three months for short-term treatment under the following conditions:

(a) The professional staff of the facility detaining the person on an emergency mental health hold has evaluated the person and has found the person has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to the person's self or others or is gravely disabled;

(b) The person has been advised of the availability of, but has not accepted, voluntary treatment; but, if reasonable grounds exist to believe that the person will not remain in a voluntary treatment program, the person's acceptance of voluntary treatment does not preclude certification;

(c) The facility or community provider that will provide short-term treatment has been designated by the commissioner to provide such treatment; and

The person, the person's legal guardian, and the person's lay person, if applicable, have been advised of the person's right to an attorney and to contest the certification for short-term treatment.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The notice of certification must be signed by a professional person on the staff of the evaluation facility who participated in the evaluation and must:

State facts sufficient to establish reasonable grounds to believe that the person has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to others or to the person's self or is gravely disabled;

Be filed with the court within forty-eight hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays, of the date of certification; and

Be filed with the court in the county in which the respondent resided or was physically present immediately prior to being taken into custody.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The notice of certification must be signed by a professional person who participated in the evaluation. The notice of certification must:

(a) State facts sufficient to establish reasonable grounds to believe that the respondent has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to the respondent's self or others or is gravely disabled;

(b) Be filed with the court within forty-eight hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays, after the date of certification;

(c) Be filed with the court in the county in which the respondent resided or was physically present immediately prior to being taken into custody; and

Provide recommendations if the certification should take place on an inpatient or outpatient basis.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Within twenty-four hours after certification, copies of the certification must be personally delivered to the respondent, and a copy must be kept by the evaluation facility as part of the respondent's record. The respondent must also be asked to designate one other person whom the respondent wishes informed regarding certification. If the respondent is incapable of making such a designation at the time the certification is delivered, the respondent must be asked to designate such person as soon as the respondent is capable. In addition to the copy of the certification, the respondent must be given a written notice that a hearing upon the respondent's certification for short-term treatment may be had before the court or a jury upon written request directed to the court pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Within twenty-four hours after certification, copies of the certification must be personally delivered to the respondent, the BHA, and a copy must be kept by the evaluating facility as part of the respondent's record, if applicable. The facility or court shall ask the respondent to designate a lay person whom the respondent wishes to be informed regarding certification. If the respondent is incapable of making such a designation at the time the certification is delivered, the respondent must be asked to designate a lay person as soon as the respondent is capable. In addition to the copy of the certification, the respondent must be given a written notice that a hearing upon the respondent's certification for short-term treatment may be had before the court or a jury upon written request directed to the court pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

Upon certification of the respondent, the facility designated for short-term treatment has custody of the respondent.

Whenever a certification is filed with the court by a professional person, the court shall immediately appoint an attorney to represent the respondent. The respondent has the right to an attorney for all proceedings conducted pursuant to this section, including any appeals. The attorney representing the respondent must be provided with a copy of the certification immediately upon the attorney's appointment. The respondent may only waive counsel when the respondent makes a knowing and intelligent waiver in front of the court.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The respondent for short-term treatment or the respondent's attorney may at any time file a written request that the certification for short-term treatment or the treatment be reviewed by the court or that the treatment be on an outpatient basis. If review is requested, the court shall hear the matter within ten days after the request, and the court shall give notice to the respondent and the respondent's attorney and the certifying and treating professional person of the time and place thereof. The hearing must be held in accordance with section 27-65-113. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court may enter or confirm the certification for short-term treatment, discharge the respondent, or enter any other appropriate order, subject to available appropriations.

(6)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The respondent or the respondent's attorney may at any time file a written request that the certification for short-term treatment or the treatment be reviewed by the court or that the treatment be on an outpatient basis. If review is requested, the court shall hear the matter within ten days after the request, and the court shall give notice to the respondent and the respondent's attorney and the certifying and treating professional person of the time and place of the hearing. The hearing must be held in accordance with section 27-65-113. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court may enter or confirm the certification for short-term treatment, discharge the respondent, or enter any other appropriate order.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Records and papers in proceedings under this section must be maintained separately by the clerks of the several courts. Upon the release of any respondent in accordance with section 27-65-112, the facility shall notify the clerk of the court within five days after the release, and the clerk shall forthwith seal the record in the case and omit the name of the respondent from the index of cases in the court until and unless the respondent becomes subject to an order of long-term care and treatment pursuant to section 27-65-110 or until and unless the court orders them opened for good cause shown. In the event a petition is filed pursuant to section 27-65-110, the certification record may be opened and become a part of the record in the long-term care and treatment case and the name of the respondent indexed.

(7)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Records and papers in proceedings pursuant to this section must be maintained separately by the clerks of the several courts. Upon the release of any respondent in accordance with section 27-65-112, the facility shall notify the clerk of the court within five days after the release, and the clerk shall immediately seal the record in the case and omit the name of the respondent from the index of cases in the court until and unless the respondent becomes subject to an order of certification for long-term care and treatment pursuant to section 27-65-110 or until and unless the court orders the records opened for good cause shown. In the event a petition is filed pursuant to section 27-65-110, the certification record may be opened and become a part of the record in the long-term care and treatment case and the name of the respondent indexed.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (8) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Whenever it appears to the court, by reason of a report by the treating professional person or any other report satisfactory to the court, that a respondent detained for evaluation and treatment or certified for treatment should be transferred to another facility for treatment and the safety of the respondent or the public requires that the respondent be transported by a secure transportation provider, or a law enforcement agency, the court may issue an order directing the law enforcement agency where the respondent resides to deliver the respondent to the designated facility.

(8)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (8) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Whenever it appears to the court, by reason of a report by the treating professional person or the BHA or any other report satisfactory to the court, that a respondent detained for evaluation and treatment or certified for short-term treatment should be transferred to another facility for treatment and the safety of the respondent or the public requires that the respondent be transported by a secure transportation provider or a law enforcement agency, the court may issue an order directing the law enforcement agency where the respondent resides or secure transportation provider to deliver the respondent to the designated facility.

A respondent certified for short-term treatment may be discharged upon the signature of the treating medical professional and the medical director of the facility. A respondent certified for short-term treatment on an outpatient basis may be discharged upon the signature of the approved professional person overseeing the respondent's treatment, and the professional person shall notify the BHA prior to the discharge. A facility or program shall make the respondent's discharge instructions available to the respondent, the respondent's attorney, and the respondent's legal guardian, if applicable, within seven days after discharge, if requested. A facility or program that is transferring a respondent to a different treatment facility or to an outpatient provider shall provide all treatment records to the facility or provider accepting the respondent at least twenty-four hours prior to the transfer.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (10) is effective until July 1, 2024.] If the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment believes that a period longer than three months is necessary for treatment of the respondent, the professional person shall file with the court an extended certification. Extended certification for treatment is not for a period of more than three months. The respondent is entitled to a hearing on the extended certification under the same conditions as an original certification. The attorney initially representing the respondent shall continue to represent the respondent, unless the court appoints another attorney.

(10)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (10) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

If the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment believes that a period longer than three months is necessary to treat the respondent, the professional person shall file with the court an extended certification at least thirty days prior to the expiration date of the original certification. An extended certification for treatment must not be for a period of more than three months. The respondent is entitled to a hearing on the extended certification under the same conditions as an original certification. The attorney initially representing the respondent shall continue to represent the respondent, unless the court appoints another attorney.

Source:

L. 2022:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1540, § 117, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3186, § 1, effective August 10; (1), (2), (3), (6), (7), (8), and (10) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3217, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

27-65-110. Long-term care and treatment of persons with mental health disorders - procedure.

Whenever a respondent has received an extended certification for treatment pursuant section 27-65-109 (10), the professional person in charge of the certification for short-term treatment or the BHA may file a petition with the court at least thirty days prior to the expiration date of the extended certification for long-term care and treatment of the respondent under the following conditions:

The professional staff of the agency or facility providing short-term treatment has analyzed the respondent's condition and has found that the respondent has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to the respondent's self or others or is gravely disabled;

The respondent has been advised of the availability of, but has not accepted, voluntary treatment; but, if reasonable grounds exist to believe that the respondent will not remain in a voluntary treatment program, the respondent's acceptance of voluntary treatment does not preclude an order pursuant to this section; and

The facility that will provide long-term care and treatment has been designated by the commissioner to provide the care and treatment.

Every petition for long-term care and treatment must include a request for a hearing before the court prior to the expiration of six months after the date of original certification and provide a recommendation as to whether the certification for long-term care and treatment should take place on an inpatient or outpatient basis. A copy of the petition must be delivered personally to the respondent for whom long-term care and treatment is sought and electronically delivered to the respondent's attorney of record simultaneously with the filing.

Within ten days after receipt of the petition, the respondent or the respondent's attorney may request a hearing before the court or a jury trial by filing a written request with the court.

The court or jury shall determine whether the conditions of subsection (1) of this section are met and whether the respondent has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to the respondent's self or others or is gravely disabled. The court shall issue an order of long-term care and treatment for a term not to exceed six months, discharge the respondent for whom long-term care and treatment was sought, or enter any other appropriate order. An order for long-term care and treatment must grant custody of the respondent to the BHA for placement with an agency or facility designated by the commissioner to provide long-term care and treatment. The BHA may delegate the physical custody of the respondent to a facility designated by the commissioner and the requirement for the provision of services and care coordination. When a petition contains a request that a specific legal disability be imposed or that a specific legal right be deprived, the court may order the disability imposed or the right deprived if the court or a jury has determined that the respondent has a mental health disorder or is gravely disabled and that, as a result, the respondent is unable to competently exercise the specific legal right or perform the function for which the disability is sought to be imposed. Any interested person may ask leave of the court to intervene as a copetitioner for the purpose of seeking the imposition of a legal disability or the deprivation of a legal right.

An original order of long-term care and treatment or any extension of such order expires on the date specified, unless further extended as provided in this subsection (5). If an extension is being sought, the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment shall certify to the court at least thirty days prior to the expiration date of the order in force that an extension of the order is necessary for the care and treatment of the respondent subject to the order in force, and a copy of the certification must be simultaneously delivered to the respondent and electronically delivered to the respondent's attorney of record. At least twenty days before the expiration of the order, the court shall give written notice to the respondent and the respondent's attorney of record that a hearing upon the extension may be had before the court or a jury upon written request to the court within ten days after receipt of the notice. If a hearing is not requested by the respondent within such time, the court may proceed ex parte. If a hearing is timely requested, the hearing must be held before the expiration date of the order in force. If the court or jury finds that the conditions of subsection (1) of this section continue to be met and that the respondent has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to others or to the respondent's self or is gravely disabled, the court shall issue an extension of the order. Any extension must not exceed six months, but there may be as many extensions as the court orders pursuant to this section.

A respondent certified for long-term care and treatment may be discharged from the facility upon the signature of the treating professional person and medical director of the facility, and the facility shall notify the BHA prior to the respondent's discharge. The facility shall make the respondent's discharge instructions available to the respondent, the respondent's attorney, the respondent's lay person, and the respondent's legal guardian, if applicable, within one week after discharge, if requested. A facility that is transferring a respondent to a different facility or to an outpatient program shall provide all treatment records to the facility or provider accepting the respondent at least twenty-four hours prior to the transfer.

Source:

L. 2022:

(1)(c) and (4) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1540, § 118, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3188, § 1, effective August 10.

27-65-111. Certification on an outpatient basis - short-term and long-term care.

[Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2024.]

Any respondent certified pursuant to section 27-65-109 or 27-65-110 may be provided treatment on an outpatient basis. The outpatient treatment provider shall develop a treatment plan for the respondent receiving treatment on an outpatient basis with the goal of the respondent finding and sustaining recovery. The treatment plan must include measures to keep the respondent or others safe, as informed by the respondent's need for certification. The treatment plan may include, but is not limited to:

Intensive case management;

Assertive community treatment;

Peer recovery services;

Individual or group therapy;

Day or partial-day programming activities;

Intensive outpatient programs;

Educational and vocational training or activities; and

Housing and transportation assistance.

The respondent, the respondent's legal guardian, the respondent's patient representative or the respondent's lay person, or any party at any court hearing may contest a respondent's treatment regimen, including court-ordered medications, at any court hearing related to the respondent's certification for treatment.

The facility responsible for providing services to a respondent on a certification on an outpatient basis shall proactively reach out to the respondent to engage the respondent in treatment. If the respondent refuses treatment or court-ordered medication and is decompensating psychiatrically, the court may order a certified peace officer or secure transportation provider to transport the respondent to an appropriate, least restrictive designated facility in collaboration with the BHA and the provider holding the certification. The respondent does not need to be imminently dangerous to the respondent's self or others for the provider to request, and the court to order, transportation to a facility for the respondent to receive treatment and court-ordered medications. The facility responsible for providing services to a respondent on a certification on an outpatient basis shall provide the court information on the facility's proactive outreach to the respondent and the professional person's and psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse's basis for medical opinion.

If a respondent is placed in a more restrictive setting, the respondent has the right to judicial review within ten days after filing a written request.

In addition to any other limitation on liability, a person providing care to a respondent placed on short-term or long-term certification on an outpatient basis is only liable for harm subsequently caused by or to a respondent who:

Has been terminated from certification despite meeting statutory criteria for certification pursuant to section 27-65-109 or 27-65-110; or

Provided services to the respondent not within the scope of the person's professional license, or was reckless or grossly negligent in providing services.

A provider is not liable if a respondent's certification is terminated, despite meeting criteria for certification, if the provider is unable to locate the respondent despite proactive and reasonable outreach.

A respondent subject to a short-term or long-term certification on an outpatient basis has the following rights, in addition to those enumerated in section 27-65-119:

To request a change to voluntary status. A change to voluntary status may be denied by the supervising professional person or advanced practice registered nurse with training in psychiatric nursing responsible for the respondent's treatment if the professional person or advanced practice registered nurse with training in psychiatric nursing determines reasonable grounds exist to believe that the respondent will not remain in a voluntary treatment program.

To be treated fairly, with respect and recognition of the respondent's dignity and individuality, by all employees of the treatment facility with whom the respondent comes in contact;

To appropriate treatment, which must be administered skillfully, safely, and humanely. A respondent shall receive treatment suited to the respondent's needs that must be determined in collaboration with the respondent.

To not be discriminated against on the basis of age, race, ethnicity, religion, culture, spoken language, physical or mental disability, socioeconomic status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression;

To retain and consult with an attorney at any time;

Within forty-eight hours after the respondent's request, to see and receive the services of a patient representative, including a peer specialist, who has no direct or indirect clinical, administrative, or financial responsibility for the respondent;

To have the respondent's behavioral health orders for scope of treatment or psychiatric advance directive reviewed and considered by the court as the preferred treatment option for involuntary administration of medications unless, by clear and convincing evidence, the respondent's directive does not qualify as effective participation in behavioral health decision-making;

To have the respondent's information and records disclosed to adult family members and a lay person pursuant to section 27-65-123;

To have access to a representative within the facility who provides assistance to file a grievance; and

To have the right to file a motion with the court at any time to contest the certification.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3190, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

27-65-112. Termination of short-term and long-term treatment - escape.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2024.]

An original or extended certification for short-term treatment or an order for long-term care and treatment or any extension thereof terminates as soon as, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of treatment of the respondent, the respondent has received sufficient benefit from such treatment for the respondent to leave. Whenever a certification or extended certification is terminated pursuant to this section, the professional person in charge of providing treatment shall notify the court in writing within five days after such termination. The professional person may also prescribe day care, night care, or any other similar mode of treatment prior to termination.

Before termination, an escaped respondent may be returned to the facility by order of the court without a hearing or by the superintendent or director of the facility without order of court. After termination, a respondent may be returned to the facility only in accordance with this article 65.

27-65-112. Termination of certification for short-term and long-term treatment.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective July 1, 2024.

]

An original or extended certification for short-term treatment issued pursuant to section 27-65-109, or an order or extension for certification for long-term care and treatment pursuant to section 27-65-110 terminates as soon as the professional person in charge of treatment of the respondent and the BHA determine the respondent has received sufficient benefit from the treatment for the respondent to end involuntary treatment. Whenever a certification or extended certification is terminated pursuant to this section, the professional person in charge of providing treatment shall notify the court in writing within five days after the termination.

(2) Before termination, a respondent who leaves a facility may be returned to the facility by order of the court without a hearing or by the superintendent or director of the facility without a court order. After termination, a respondent may be returned to the facility only in accordance with this article 65.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3192, § 1, effective August 10; entire section amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3219, § 4, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to former § 27-65-110 as it existed prior to 2022. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

27-65-113. Hearing procedures - jurisdiction.

Hearings before the court pursuant to section 27-65-109 or 27-65-110 are conducted in the same manner as other civil proceedings before the court. The burden of proof is on the person or facility seeking to detain the respondent. The court or jury shall determine that the respondent is in need of care and treatment only if the court or jury finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to the respondent's self or others or is gravely disabled.

The court, after consultation with respondent's counsel to obtain counsel's recommendations, may appoint a professional person to examine the respondent for whom short-term treatment or long-term care and treatment is sought and to testify at the hearing before the court as to the results of the professional person's examination. The court-appointed professional person shall act solely in an advisory capacity, and no presumption is attached to the professional person's findings.

Every respondent subject to an order for short-term treatment or long-term care and treatment must be advised of the respondent's right to appeal the order by the court at the conclusion of any hearing and, as a result, the order may be entered.

The court in which the petition is filed under section 27-65-106 or the certification is filed pursuant to section 27-65-109 is the court of original jurisdiction and of continuing jurisdiction for any further proceedings pursuant to this article 65. When the convenience of the parties and the ends of justice would be promoted by a change in the court having jurisdiction, the court may order a transfer of the proceeding to another county. Until further order of the transferee court, if any, it is the court of continuing jurisdiction.

In the event that a respondent or a person found not guilty by reason of impaired mental condition pursuant to section 16-8-103.5 (5), or by reason of insanity pursuant to section 16-8-105 (4) or 16-8-105.5, refuses to accept medication, the court having jurisdiction of the action pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the court committing the person or defendant to the custody of the BHA pursuant to section 16-8-103.5 (5), 16-8-105 (4), or 16-8-105.5, or the court of the jurisdiction in which the designated facility treating the respondent or person is located has jurisdiction and venue to accept a petition by a treating physician and to enter an order requiring that the respondent or person accept such treatment or, in the alternative, that the medication be forcibly administered to the respondent or person. The court of the jurisdiction in which the designated facility is located shall not exercise its jurisdiction without the permission of the court that committed the person to the custody of the BHA. Upon the filing of such a petition, the court shall appoint an attorney, if one has not been appointed, to represent the respondent or person and hear the matter within ten days.

In any case brought pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section in a court for the county in which the treating facility is located, the county where the proceeding was initiated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or the court committing the person to the custody of the BHA pursuant to section 16-8-103.5 (5), 16-8-105 (4), or 16-8-105.5, shall either reimburse the county in which the proceeding pursuant to this subsection (5) was filed and in which the proceeding was held for the reasonable costs incurred in conducting the proceeding or conduct the proceeding itself using its own personnel and resources, including its own district or county attorney, as the case may be.

In the case of a defendant who is found incompetent to proceed pursuant to section 16-8.5-103 and who refuses to accept medication, the jurisdiction for the petition for involuntary treatment procedures is as set forth in section 16-8.5-112.

All adversarial proceedings pursuant to this article 65, including proceedings to impose a legal disability pursuant to section 27-65-127, must be conducted by the district attorney of the county where the proceeding is held or by a qualified attorney acting for the district attorney appointed by the district court for that purpose; except that, in any county or in any city and county having a population exceeding fifty thousand persons, the proceedings must be conducted by the county attorney or by a qualified attorney acting for the county attorney appointed by the district court. In any case in which there has been a change of venue to a county other than the county of residence of the respondent or the county in which the certification proceeding was commenced, the county from which the proceeding was transferred shall either reimburse the county to which the proceeding was transferred and in which the proceeding was held for the reasonable costs incurred in conducting the proceeding or conduct the proceeding itself using its own personnel and resources, including its own district or county attorney, as the case may be.

Upon request of a legal guardian appointed pursuant to article 14 of title 15, the legal guardian may intervene in any proceeding brought pursuant to this article 65 concerning the legal guardian's ward and, through counsel, may present evidence and represent to the court the views of the legal guardian concerning the appropriate disposition of the case.

A lay person may submit an affidavit to the court concerning the lay person's relationship to the respondent, how long the lay person has known the respondent, the lay person's physical address, and the lay person's views concerning the appropriate disposition of the respondent's case.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3193, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to former § 27-65-111 as it existed prior to 2022. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

27-65-114. Appeals.

Appellate review of any order of short-term treatment or long-term care and treatment may be had as provided in the Colorado appellate rules. An appeal must be advanced upon the calendar of the appellate court and must be decided at the earliest practicable time. Pending disposition by the appellate court, the court may make such order as the court may consider proper in the premises relating to the care and custody of the respondent.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3195, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-112 as it existed prior to 2022. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

27-65-115. Habeas corpus.

Any person detained pursuant to this article 65 is entitled to an order in the nature of habeas corpus upon proper petition to any court generally empowered to issue orders in the nature of habeas corpus.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3195, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-113 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-116. Restoration of rights.

Any person who, by reason of a judicial decree entered by a court of this state prior to July 1, 1975, is adjudicated as a person with a mental illness is deemed to have been restored to legal capacity and competency.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3195, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-114 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-117. Discrimination - definition.

No person who has received an evaluation or treatment pursuant to this article 65 may be discriminated against for receiving an evaluation or treatment. For purposes of this section, "discrimination" means giving any undue weight to the fact of hospitalization or outpatient care and treatment unrelated to a person's present capacity to meet standards applicable to all persons. Any person who suffers injury by reason of a violation of this section has a civil cause of action.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3195, § 1, effective August 10; (1)(b) and (1)(c) repealed, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3240, § 56, effective August 10.

27-65-118. Right to treatment - rules.

Any person receiving an evaluation or treatment pursuant to this article 65 is entitled to medical and psychiatric care and treatment, with regard to services listed in section 27-66-101 and services listed in rules authorized by section 27-66-102, suited to meet the person's individual needs, delivered in such a way as to keep the person in the least restrictive environment, and delivered in such a way as to include the opportunity for participation of family members in the person's program of care and treatment, when appropriate. Nothing in this subsection (1)(a) creates any right with respect to any person other than the person receiving an evaluation, care, or treatment. The professional person and the agency or facility providing an evaluation, care, or treatment shall keep records detailing all care and treatment received by the person, and the records must be made available, upon the person's written authorization, to the person's attorney or the person's personal physician. The records are permanent records and must be retained in accordance with section 27-65-123 (4).

Any person receiving an evaluation or treatment pursuant to this article 65 may petition the court pursuant to section 13-45-102, for release to a less restrictive setting within or without a treating facility or release from a treating facility when adequate medical and psychiatric care and treatment are not administered.

The BHA shall promulgate rules to assure that each agency or facility providing an evaluation, care, or treatment requires the following:

Consent for specific therapies and major medical treatment in the nature of surgery. The nature of the consent, by whom it is given, and under what conditions, is determined by rules of the BHA.

The order of a physician for any treatment or specific therapy based on appropriate medical examinations;

Notation in the patient's treatment record of periodic examinations, evaluations, orders for treatment, and specific therapies, signed by personnel involved;

Conduct according to the guidelines contained in the regulations of the federal government and the rules of the BHA with regard to clinical investigations, research, experimentation, and testing of any kind; and

Documentation of the findings, conclusions, and decisions in any administrative review of a decision to release or withhold the information requested by a family member or lay person pursuant to section 27-65-123 (1)(g) or (1)(h) and documentation of any information given to a family member or lay person.

Source:

L. 2022:

IP(2), (2)(a), and (2)(d) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1540, § 119, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3195, § 1, effective August 10.